src/fst/morphology/affixes/possessorindices.lexc
LEXICON OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG3
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL1
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL2
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL3
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ст K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ск K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}нст K ;
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PRON-PERSONS ! cькамо-:ськам
:о OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMN-PERSONS ;
+Der/Dimin:не OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMN-PERSONS ;
+Der/Dimin:нэ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMN-PERSONS ;
+Der/Dimin:ине OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMN-PERSONS ;
+Der/Dimin:нине OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMN-PERSONS ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMN-PERSONS
@U.PossPx.Sg1@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG1 ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG2 ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG3 ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL1 ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL2 ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL3 ;
!!
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG1
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG1 ;
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG2
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG2 ;
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG3
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG3 ;
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL1
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL1 ;
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL2
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL2 ;
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL3
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@ OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL3 ;

! THESE have nominal person tags passed to them with person confirmation through flags
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG1
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}м CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG2
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%}  CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNSG3
@U.PossPx.Sg3@:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL1
@U.PossPx.Pl1@:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL2
@U.PossPx.Pl2@:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_NMNPL3
@U.PossPx.Pl3@:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ст CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ск CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}нст CLT/COP-4-OBL-OR-MWN-DEF-OR-K ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
